District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-418

Waiver of certain requirements.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 15, 1966, 80 Stat. 959, Pub. L. 89-682, § 3
July 7, 1967, 81 Stat. 122, Pub. L. 90-53, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, § 155(a)
Sept. 11, 2008, D.C. Law 17-222, § 3(b), 55 DCR 8295
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-148, § 3(a), 61 DCR 8314

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-421.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-118.
1973 Ed., § 30-120.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-222 substituted “§ 46-409” for “§§ 46-409 and 46-417”.